Wyoming, session 2026, HB0153.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 23-3-306(a) is amended to read:

23-3-306. Use of aircraft, automobiles, motorized and
snow vehicles and artificial light for hunting or fishing
prohibited; exceptions; penalties.

(a) The following shall apply to the taking of
wildlife:
HB0153

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0425

(i) No person shall harass, pursue, hunt, shoot,
or kill any Wyoming wildlife that requires a license or
permit to take, is protected under W.S. 23-1-101(a)(ix) and
(x) or is classified as threatened or endangered by federal
wildlife regulations, with, from, or by use of any
aircraft, automotive vehicle, trailer, motor-propelled
wheeled vehicle, or vehicle designed for travel over snow
anywhere in the state of Wyoming;.

(ii) When on public land, no person in the state
of Wyoming shall intentionally harass, pursue, hunt, shoot,
injure or kill any Wyoming wildlife or predatory animals
with an automotive vehicle, trailer, motor-propelled
wheeled vehicle or vehicle designed for travel over snow.

(iii) No person shall use any aircraft, to aid
in the taking of any Wyoming wildlife, except predatory
animals, whether by spotting or locating the wildlife,
communicating with any person attempting to take the
wildlife, or by providing other aid to any person taking
the wildlife;.

HB0153

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0425
(iv) Nothing in this subsection shall apply to
the use of any aircraft by governmental agencies, their
employees, contractors or designees performing any lawful
duties;.

(v) The commission may exempt handicapped
hunters from any provision of this subsection;.

(vi) For purposes of this section, "aircraft"
means any machine or device capable of atmospheric flight
including but not limited to an airplane, helicopter,
glider, dirigible or unmanned aerial vehicle.

Section 2. The game and fish commission shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

HB0153

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0425
Section 3.

(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0153